Utah statutes.
4-1-7.   Severability clause.
If any provision of this code or the application of any such provision to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or applications of this code which can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code
are declared to be severable.
